Hawaii, session 2026, SB2192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that, according to the 2024 Hawaii Housing Planning Study prepared for the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation, the State needs an estimated additional 64,490 housing units through 2027 to meet current and projected demand.  However, the State is currently on track to build only 13,471 units by 2027.  The legislature believes that it is essential for the counties, at minimum, to maintain the housing supply to help the State with housing production goals. The Legislature further finds that downzoning constitutes a significant threat to the State's housing supply by forcing developers to abandon or significantly modify development plans.  Additionally, downzoning imposes long-term constraints on housing development.  Past instances of downzoning, including in Waikiki and other parts of the State, have posed a serious challenge to existing development plans.  Without adequate compensation for downzoning by upzoning other areas, the State will experience diminished housing production, which is necessary to accommodate the State's growing population. The purpose of this Act is to provide that each county may only reduce the number of housing units that may be built within any geographical area of the county if the county increases the number of housing units that may be built elsewhere in the county, so that there is no net loss in residential capacity in the county. SECTION 2. Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46-    Reduction in housing units; residential capacity; no net loss.  A county may reduce the number of housing units that may be built within any geographical area of the county only if the county increases the number of housing units that may be built elsewhere in the county, such that there is no net loss in total residential capacity in the county." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.